North Dakota, session 69, SB2159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15-11-40 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15-11-40. State energy research center - Report.
1. The state energy research center at the university of North Dakota energy and environmental
research center is created to conduct exploratory, transformational, and innovative research
that advances future energy opportunities and benefits the state's economy and environment
through:
a. Exploratory research of technologies and methodologies that facilitate the prudent
development, and clean and efficient use, of the state's energy resources;
b. Greater access to energy experts for timely scientific and engineering studies to support
the state's interests; and
c. Education and outreach related to the state's energy resources.
2. The state energy research center shall report all research activities and accomplishments
annually to the interim legislative energy development and transmission committee and the
industrial commission. Upon request, the state energy research center shall report all research
activities and accomplishments to the appropriations committees of the legislative assembly.
3. To carry out the purposes of this section, the energy and environmental research center may:
a. Select the research topics and projects to be pursued;
b. Enter contracts or agreements with other North Dakota institutions of higher education to
support select research topics and projects;
c. Enter contracts or agreements with federal, private, and nonprofit organizations to carry
out selected research topics and projects; and
d. Accept donations, grants, contributions, and gifts from any source to carry out the
selected research topics and projects.
4. TheIf approved by the industrial commission and conducted in consultation with the high-level
radioactive waste advisory council, the state energy research center may not conduct
research or pursue projects that will result in the exploration, storage, treatment, or disposal of
high-level radioactive waste above ground in North Dakota.

S. B. NO. 2159 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2159.
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 3 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 57 Nays 32 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State